Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5191.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-4 of the General Laws entitled "State Emblems" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-4-24. State music.
The music genre of rhythm and blues is hereby designated as the state music. For purposes
of this section, rhythm and blues is defined as music which contains elements of pop, soul, funk,
hip-hop and electronic music.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000084
========